Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
[OLD] ANTIPOLLUTION REVENUE BONDS

§§39-125 to 131 REPEALED. L 1979, c
57, §13.

[PART V.]
STATEMENT ON SPECIAL PURPOSE REVENUE BONDS

§39-101 Renumbered as §39A-1.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next